Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-126 Comply with foreign laws.
Any domestic insurer doing business in a state, territory or sovereignty may
design and issue insurance contracts and transact insurance in such state,
territory or sovereignty as required or permitted by the laws thereof. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next